California, session 20252026, AB2272.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 927.10 of the Government Code is amended to read:927.10. (a) State agencies shall encourage claimants to promptly pay their subcontractors and suppliers, especially those that are small businesses. In furtherance of this policy, state agencies shall utilize expedited payment processes to enable faster payment by prime contractors to their subcontractors and suppliers, and shall promptly respond to any subcontractor or supplier inquiries regarding the status of payments made to prime contractors.(b) A subcontractor or supplier performing work under a state contract may request payment status information from the awarding state agency regarding invoices submitted by the prime contractor.(c) A prime contractor shall provide confirmation to the awarding agency, upon the agency’s request, regarding payments made to subcontractors.SECTION 1.Section 927.10 of the Government Code is amended to read:927.10.(a)(1)For all payments made by the state to prime contractors on or after January 1, 2027, prime contractors shall pay their subcontractors, suppliers, and other vendors within 45 days of receiving payment from the state.(2)For payments made from the state to prime contractors prior to January 1, 2027, but that have not been remitted to subcontractors, suppliers, and other vendors as of January 1, 2027, prime contractors shall remit such payment by February 15, 2027.(b)State agencies shall utilize expedited payment processes to enable faster payment by prime contractors to their subcontractors, suppliers, and other vendors, and shall promptly respond to any subcontractor, supplier, or vendor inquiries regarding the status of payments made to prime contractors.(c)(1)The Department of General Services shall monitor compliance with subdivision (a).(2)Prime contractors that fail to comply with subdivision (a) shall receive a demerit, which shall negatively affect the claimant’s eligibility for all subsequent bids for contracts, other contract requests, and contract renewals with the state. At minimum, the following penalties shall apply:(A)Prime contractors that fail to comply with subdivision (a) for five payments within a three-year period shall be prohibited from renewing or entering into contracts with the state for six months.(B)Prime contractors that fail to comply with subdivision (a) for 10 payments within a three-year period shall be prohibited from renewing or entering into contracts with the state for one year.(3)For contracts entered into or renewed with the state on or after January 1, 2027, the Department of General Services may review and rescind a prime contractor’s existing contracts if the prime contractor repeatedly fails to comply with subdivision (a).(d)The Department of General Services shall adopt any rules and regulations to administer this section, including, but not limited to, a demerit tracking system and coordination with state agencies for penalty enforcement.